District of Columbia statutes.
34-922

Certified copy of transcript to be received in evidence; copy to be furnished without cost.

A transcribed copy of the evidence and proceedings, or any specific part thereof, in any investigation taken by a stenographer appointed by the Commission, being certified by such stenographer to be a true and correct transcript of all the testimony in the investigation or of a particular witness, or of other specific part thereof, carefully compared by him with his original notes, and to be a correct statement of the evidence and proceedings had in such investigation so purporting to be taken and transcribed, shall be received in evidence with the same effect as if such reporter were present and testified to the fact so certified. A copy of such transcript shall be furnished on demand, free of cost, to any party to such investigation.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 985, ch. 150, § 8, par. 53
1973 Ed., § 43-422.
1981 Ed., § 43-623.
Separability clauses, see §§ 34-405 and 34-406.
General provisions, construction and severability of law, see § 34-403.
Failure to obey Commission, penalties, see §§ 34-706, 34-731 and 34-732.